Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.210

Duty disability retirement allowance for disability after age sixty.

Upon retirement for disability, as provided in RCW 41.40.200, a member who has attained age sixty, regardless of his or her creditable service shall receive a service retirement allowance.

[ 2012 c 117 s 59; 1972 ex.s. c 151 s 8; 1947 c 274 s 22; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11072-22.]